src/fst/stems/arabic_roman_digits.lexc
LEXICON ARABICLOOP   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
                                               ARABIC          ;
                                 %.%-:%.∑-     ARABIC          ; ! 1.-2 multipart numbers ! !
                                 %.%–:%.%–     ARABIC          ; ! 1.–2 multipart numbers ! !
                                 %.%—:%.%—     ARABIC          ; ! 1.—2 multipart numbers ! !
                                 %.%-:%.% ∑-   ARABICORD       ; ! 1. -2. multipart numbers ! !
                                 %.%-:%.%-%    ARABICORD       ; ! 1. - 2. multipart numbers ! !
                                 %.%-:%.% ∑-%  ARABICORD       ; ! 1. - 2. multipart numbers ! !
                                 %.%–:%.% %–%  ARABICORD       ; ! 1. – 2. multipart numbers ! !
                                 %.%-:%.∑-     ARABICORD       ; ! 1.-2. multipart numbers ! !
                                 %.%–:%.%–     ARABICORD       ; ! 1.–2. multipart numbers ! !
                                 %.%—:%.%—     ARABICORD       ; ! 1.—2. multipart numbers ! !
                                 %-% :∑-%      ARABIC          ; ! 1- 2 multipart numbers
                                 %–% :%–%      ARABIC          ; ! 1– 2 multipart numbers
                                 %—% :%—%      ARABIC          ; ! 1— 2 multipart numbers
                                 % %-:% ∑-     ARABIC          ; ! 1 -2 multipart numbers
                                 % %–:% %–     ARABIC          ; ! 1 –2 multipart numbers
                                 % %—:% %—     ARABIC          ; ! 1 —2 multipart numbers
  % %-% +Use/-PMatch+Use/-GC+Use/-TTS:% ∑-%    ARABIC          ; ! 1 - 2 multipart numbers
                               % %–% :% %–%    ARABIC          ; ! 1 – 2 multipart numbers
                               % %—% :% %—%    ARABIC          ; ! 1 — 2 multipart numbers
                             % %-%-% :% ∑-∑-%  ARABIC          ; ! 1 -- 2 multipart numbers
                             % %–%–% :% %–%–%  ARABIC          ; ! 1 –– 2 multipart numbers
                             % %—%—% :% %—%—%  ARABIC          ; ! 1 —— 2 multipart numbers
                                   %.:%.       ARABIC          ;
                                   %::%:       ARABIC          ;
!                                  %,:%,       ARABIC          ;
                                     :         ARABIC          ; ! Allowing for "23 500" w/nbsp (init char = alt-space)
!                                  % :%        ARABIC          ; ! Allowing for "23 500". Lene: Denne er plagsom og bør forbedres. F.eks. 2017 30 vil vi ikke ha om ett tall.
                                   %/:%/       ARABIC          ; ! 24/12
                                 %/% :%/%      ARABIC          ; ! 24/ 12
                                 % %/:% %/     ARABIC          ; ! 24 /12
                                    ':'        ARABIC          ;

                            +Num+Arab:         RNum            ; ! Num Cmp Noun, with hyphen

!                       % %-+Err/Orth:% ∑-     ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 1 - multipart numbers - "1 -:s"?
!                     % %-%-+Err/Orth:% ∑-∑-   ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 1 -- multipart numbers
!                                              ARABICDELIMITER ; ! list of number-case delimiters
                                               ID-ARABIC       ;


LEXICON MARKDOT !!≈ * __@CODE@__
! This should create a new backtrack-point before the dot, but no sub-reading:
   +Use/-PMatch:%. # ;
< "+Use/PMatch":0 "@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@" 0:%. > # ; ! This creates a split point
   +Use/PMatch+CLBfinal: # ; ! This creates an alternative end point for those
                             ! requiring a full stop, so that when the previous line
                             ! forces a bactrack and reanalysis, the expression can
                             ! end up here, and then make the additional PUNCT analysis
                             ! of the full stop. Without this line, there will never
                             ! be this extra analysis, and the abbr/date/whatever +
                             ! end of sentence reading will never be possible.



! The Roman numerals !
! ------------------ !

LEXICON ROMAN   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  roman numerals
 +Use/Circ: ROM-THOUSAND ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-HUNDRED ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-TEN ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-ONE ; !
  ROM-SINGEL ; !


LEXICON ROM-SINGEL   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
    I+Use/NG:i    ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   II+Use/NG:ii   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
  III+Use/NG:iii  ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   IV+Use/NG:iv   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
    V+Use/NG:v    ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   VI+Use/NG:vi   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
  VII+Use/NG:vii  ROM-ONE-TAG ;
 VIII+Use/NG:viii ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   IX+Use/NG:ix   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
    X+Use/NG:x   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   XI+Use/NG:xi   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   XII+Use/NG:xii   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   XIII+Use/NG:xiii   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   XIV+Use/NG:xiv   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   XV+Use/NG:xv   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   XVI+Use/NG:xvi   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   XVII+Use/NG:xvii   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   XVIII+Use/NG:xviii   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   XIX+Use/NG:xix   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   XX+Use/NG:xx   ROM-ONE-TAG ;


LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
     M+Use/Circ:M     ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
    MM+Use/Circ:MM    ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
   MMM+Use/Circ:MMM   ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
  MMMM+Use/Circ:MMMM  ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
 MMMMM+Use/Circ:MMMMM ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;

LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG   ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-HUNDRED ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-TEN     ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-ONE     ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT   ; !

LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
    C+Use/Circ:C    ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CC+Use/Circ:CC   ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
  CCC+Use/Circ:CCC  ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CD+Use/Circ:CD   ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
    D+Use/Circ:D    ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   DC+Use/Circ:DC   ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
  DCC+Use/Circ:DCC  ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
 DCCC+Use/Circ:DCCC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CM+Use/Circ:CM   ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;

LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;
 +Use/Circ: ROM-TEN   ;
 +Use/Circ: ROM-ONE   ;
 +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT ;

LEXICON ROM-TEN   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
    X+Use/Circ:X    ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XX+Use/Circ:XX   ROM-TEN-TAG ;
  XXX+Use/Circ:XXX  ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XL+Use/Circ:XL   ROM-TEN-TAG ;
    L+Use/Circ:L    ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   LX+Use/Circ:LX   ROM-TEN-TAG ;
  LXX+Use/Circ:LXX  ROM-TEN-TAG ;
 LXXX+Use/Circ:LXXX ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XC+Use/Circ:XC   ROM-TEN-TAG ;

LEXICON ROM-TEN-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;
 +Use/Circ: ROM-ONE   ;
 +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT ;

LEXICON ROM-ONE   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
    I:I    ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   II:II   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
  III:III  ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   IV:IV   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
    V:V    ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   VI:VI   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
  VII:VII  ROM-ONE-TAG ;
 VIII:VIII ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   IX:IX   ROM-ONE-TAG ;

LEXICON ROM-ONE-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
  +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;
!        +N: ROMNUMTAG ; ! !The Olav viđeš fix (Roman V now gets A)
  +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT ;

! Here, we split the Roman numerals, in order to account for cases like
! "Kapihtal II-IV". We may send this first part directly to ROM-TAG below (and
! get the +Num tag), or we may send them through a second loop, identical to
! the first one, but marked wit "2" (the lexica are called 2ROMAN, etc. We do
! this instead of making a loop, since we do not want cases like
! "II-IV-VI-VII-IX". If that should turn out to be a good idea, a loop would
! do the trick.

LEXICON ROM-SPLIT   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 %-+Use/Circ:∑- 2ROMAN ; ! II-VI, etc. !


! Here goes loop 2.

LEXICON 2ROMAN   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-THOUSAND ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-HUNDRED  ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN      ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE      ;

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
     M+Use/Circ:M     2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
    MM+Use/Circ:MM    2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
   MMM+Use/Circ:MMM   2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
  MMMM+Use/Circ:MMMM  2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
 MMMMM+Use/Circ:MMMMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG    ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-HUNDRED ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN     ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE     ;

LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
    C+Use/Circ:C    2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CC+Use/Circ:CC   2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
  CCC+Use/Circ:CCC  2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CD+Use/Circ:CD   2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
    D+Use/Circ:D    2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   DC+Use/Circ:DC   2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
  DCC+Use/Circ:DCC  2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
 DCCC+Use/Circ:DCCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CM+Use/Circ:CM   2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;

LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN  ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE  ;

LEXICON 2ROM-TEN   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
    X+Use/Circ:X    2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XX+Use/Circ:XX   2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
  XXX+Use/Circ:XXX  2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XL+Use/Circ:XL   2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
    L+Use/Circ:L    2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   LX+Use/Circ:LX   2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
  LXX+Use/Circ:LXX  2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
 LXXX+Use/Circ:LXXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XC+Use/Circ:XC   2ROM-TEN-TAG ;

LEXICON 2ROM-TEN-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE  ;

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
    I:I    2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   II:II   2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
  III:III  2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   IV:IV   2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
    V:V    2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   VI:VI   2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
  VII:VII  2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
 VIII:VIII 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   IX:IX   2ROM-ONE-TAG ;

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;




! A final section with some isolated numeral expresssions !
! ------------------------------------------------------- !

LEXICON ISOLATED-NUMEXP   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ some isolated numeral expressions
           ½:½   NUMTAG ;
           ¹:¹   NUMTAG ;
           ²:²   NUMTAG ;
           ³:³   NUMTAG ;
           ¼:¼   NUMTAG ;
           ¾:¾   NUMTAG ;
